Ohio, session 136, SB399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.32, 2915.02, 2915.08, 2915.081, 2915.082, 2915.10, and 2915.14 be amended and sections 2915.021 and 2915.083 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.32. (A) All annual filing fees obtained by the attorney general pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, all receipts obtained from the sale of the charitable foundations directory, all registration fees received by the attorney general, bond forfeitures, awards of costs and attorney's fees, and civil penalties assessed under Chapter 1716. of the Revised Code, all license fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code, all fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the attorney general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the charitable law fund. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section, the charitable law fund shall be used insofar as its moneys are available for the expenses of the charitable law section of the office of the attorney general. (2) All annual license fees that are received by the attorney general under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code, and all filing fees received by the attorney general under divisions (F) and (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code, that are credited to the fund shall be used by the attorney general, or any law enforcement agency in cooperation with the attorney general, for the purposes specified in division (H) of section 2915.10 2915.021 of the Revised Code and to administer and enforce Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. (3) All fees received by the attorney general under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code that are credited to the fund shall be used for the purposes specified in that section. (C) The expenses of the charitable law section in excess of moneys available in the charitable law fund shall be paid out of regular appropriations to the office of the attorney general. Sec. 2915.02. (A) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Engage in bookmaking, or knowingly engage in conduct that facilitates bookmaking; (2) Establish, promote, or operate or knowingly engage in conduct that facilitates any game of chance conducted for profit or any scheme of chance; (3) Knowingly procure, transmit, exchange, or engage in conduct that facilitates the procurement, transmission, or exchange of information for use in establishing odds or determining winners in connection with bookmaking or with any game of chance conducted for profit or any scheme of chance; (4) Engage in betting or in playing any scheme or game of chance as a substantial source of income or livelihood; (5) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility and either: (a) Give to another person any item described in division (VV)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code as a prize for playing or participating in a sweepstakes; or (b) Give to another person any merchandise prize, or a redeemable voucher for a merchandise prize, the wholesale value of which is in excess of ten dollars and which is awarded as a single entry for playing or participating in a sweepstakes. Redeemable vouchers shall not be redeemable for a merchandise prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten dollars. (6) Conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility without first obtaining a current annual "certificate of registration" from the attorney general as required by division (F) of this section; (7) With purpose to violate division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section, acquire, possess, control, or operate any gambling device. (B) For purposes of division (A)(1) of this section, a person facilitates bookmaking if the person in any way knowingly aids an illegal bookmaking operation, including, without limitation, placing a bet with a person engaged in or facilitating illegal bookmaking. For purposes of division (A)(2) of this section, a person facilitates a game of chance conducted for profit or a scheme of chance if the person in any way knowingly aids in the conduct or operation of any such game or scheme, including, without limitation, playing any such game or scheme. (C) This section does not prohibit conduct in connection with gambling expressly permitted by law. (D) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) Games of chance, if all of the following apply: (a) The games of chance are not craps for money or roulette for money. (b) The games of chance are conducted by a charitable organization that is, and has received from the internal revenue service a determination letter that is currently in effect, stating that the organization is, exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. (c) The games of chance are conducted at festivals of the charitable organization that are conducted not more than a total of five days a calendar year, and are conducted on premises owned by the charitable organization for a period of no less than one year immediately preceding the conducting of the games of chance, on premises leased from a governmental unit, or on premises that are leased from a veteran's or fraternal organization and that have been owned by the lessor veteran's or fraternal organization for a period of no less than one year immediately preceding the conducting of the games of chance. A charitable organization shall not lease premises from a veteran's or fraternal organization to conduct a festival described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section if the veteran's or fraternal organization already has leased the premises twelve times during the preceding year to charitable organizations for that purpose. If a charitable organization leases premises from a veteran's or fraternal organization to conduct a festival described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section, the charitable organization shall not pay a rental rate for the premises per day of the festival that exceeds the rental rate per bingo session that a charitable organization may pay under division (B)(1) of section 2915.09 of the Revised Code when it leases premises from another charitable organization to conduct bingo games. (d) All of the money or assets received from the games of chance after deduction only of prizes paid out during the conduct of the games of chance are used by, or given, donated, or otherwise transferred to, any organization that is described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or an organization that is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (e) The games of chance are not conducted during, or within ten hours of, a bingo game conducted for amusement purposes only pursuant to section 2915.12 of the Revised Code. No person shall receive any commission, wage, salary, reward, tip, donation, gratuity, or other form of compensation, directly or indirectly, for operating or assisting in the operation of any game of chance. (2) Any tag fishing tournament operated under a permit issued under section 1533.92 of the Revised Code, as "tag fishing tournament" is defined in section 1531.01 of the Revised Code; (3) Bingo conducted by a charitable organization that holds a license issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (E) Division (D) of this section shall not be construed to authorize the sale, lease, or other temporary or permanent transfer of the right to conduct games of chance, as granted by that division, by any charitable organization that is granted that right. (F) Any person desiring to conduct, or participate in the conduct of, a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility shall first register with the office of the attorney general and obtain an annual certificate of registration by providing a filing fee of two hundred dollars and all information as required by rule adopted under division (H) of this section. Not later than the tenth day of each month, each sweepstakes terminal device operator shall file a sweepstakes terminal device monthly report with the attorney general and provide a filing fee of fifty dollars and all information required by rule adopted under division (H) of this section. All information provided to the attorney general under this division shall be available to law enforcement upon request. (G) A person may apply to the attorney general, on a form prescribed by the attorney general, for a certificate of compliance that the person is not operating a sweepstakes terminal device facility. The form shall require the person to include the address of the business location where sweepstakes terminal devices will be used and to make the following certifications: (1) That the person will not use more than two sweepstakes terminal devices at the business location; (2) That the retail value of sweepstakes prizes to be awarded at the business location using sweepstakes terminal devices during a reporting period will be less than three per cent of the gross revenue received at the business location during the reporting period; (3) That no other form of gaming except lottery ticket sales as authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code will be conducted at the business location or in an adjoining area of the business location; (4) That any sweepstakes terminal device at the business location will not allow any deposit of any money, coin, or token, or the use of any credit card, debit card, prepaid card, or any other method of similar payment to be used, directly or indirectly, to participate in a sweepstakes; (5) That notification of any prize will not take place on the same day as a participant's sweepstakes entry; and (6) That the person consents to provide any other information to the attorney general as required by rule adopted under division (H) of this section. The filing fee for a certificate of compliance is two hundred fifty dollars. The attorney general may charge up to an additional two hundred fifty dollars for reasonable expenses resulting from any investigation related to an application for a certificate of compliance. A certificate of compliance is effective for one year. The certificate holder may reapply for a certificate of compliance. A person issued a certificate of compliance shall file semiannual reports with the attorney general stating the number of sweepstakes terminal devices at the business location and that the retail value of prizes awarded at the business location using sweepstakes terminal devices is less than three per cent of the gross revenue received at the business location. (H) The attorney general shall adopt rules setting forth: (1) The required information to be submitted by persons conducting a sweepstakes with the use of a sweepstakes terminal device at a sweepstakes terminal device facility as described in division (F) of this section; and (2) The requirements pertaining to a certificate of compliance under division (G) of this section, which shall provide for a person to file a consolidated application and a consolidated semiannual report if a person has more than one business location. The attorney general shall issue a certificate of registration or a certificate of compliance to all persons who have successfully satisfied the applicable requirements of this section. The attorney general shall post online a registry of all properly registered and certified sweepstakes terminal device operators. (I) The attorney general may refuse to issue an annual certificate of registration or certificate of compliance to any person or, if one has been issued, the attorney general may revoke a certificate of registration or a certificate of compliance if the applicant has provided any information to the attorney general as part of a registration, certification, monthly report, semiannual report, or any other information that is materially false or misleading, or if the applicant or any officer, partner, or owner of five per cent or more interest in the applicant has violated any provision of this chapter. (J) The attorney general may take any necessary and reasonable action to determine a violation of this chapter, including requesting documents and information, performing inspections of premises, or requiring the attendance of any person at an examination under oath. (K) Whoever violates this section is guilty of gambling, a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of any gambling offense, gambling is a felony of the fifth degree. Notwithstanding this division, failing to file a sweepstakes terminal device monthly report as required by division (F) of this section or the semiannual report required by division (G) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 2915.021. (A) The attorney general may take any necessary and reasonable action to determine whether a violation of this chapter or the rules of the attorney general adopted under this chapter is occurring or has occurred, including all of the following: (1) Investigating any person, including a charitable organization, distributor, or manufacturer or any officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer; (2) Conducting inspections of premises. An inspection of premises may be conducted only when the premises is open for business or when the investigator or inspector reasonably believes that activity is occurring on the premises. An inspection of premises may include the search and seizure of books, records, gambling devices, and other materials, wherever they may be found on the premises, if the investigator or inspector reasonably suspects that they are evidence of such a violation. (3) Conducting inspections, audits, and observations of bingo or games of chance; (4) Requiring the production of documentary material; (5) Requiring the attendance of any person, including any person who has knowledge of any documentary material required to be produced under division (A)(4) of this section, to testify under oath in one of the following locations, as applicable: (a) The county in which the person resides or has a place of business; (b) Franklin county, if the person has no residence or place of business in this state or if the person consents to testify there. (B) In addition to pursuing any other remedy authorized by law, the attorney general may bring a civil action to enforce this chapter or any rule of the attorney general adopted under this chapter. (C) A prosecuting attorney who brings a criminal or civil action to enforce this chapter shall give written notice to the attorney general when commencing the action. (D) No person shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Destroy, alter, conceal, withhold, or deny access to any documentary material that has been requested for examination or required to be produced under this section; (2) Obstruct, impede, or interfere with any inspection, audit, or observation under this section; (3) Refuse to comply with any reasonable request of, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any other reasonable action undertaken by, the attorney general pursuant to this section. (E) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of obstructing a gambling investigation, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (F) Any documentary material obtained by the attorney general pursuant to an investigation conducted under this section is not subject to disclosure as a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2915.08. (A)(1) Except as otherwise permitted under section 2915.092 of the Revised Code, annually before the first day of January, a charitable organization that desires to conduct bingo shall apply to the attorney general for one or more of the following types of licenses to conduct bingo, as appropriate: (a) A type I license to conduct bingo as described in division (O)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code; (b) A type II license to conduct instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both at a bingo session; (c) A type III license to conduct instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, or both other than at a bingo session, in accordance with sections 2915.093 to 2915.095 or sections 2915.13 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) A veteran's organization or fraternal organization that is authorized under section 2915.14 of the Revised Code to conduct electronic instant bingo may be issued only one license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any one time. The organization may conduct electronic instant bingo under that license at only one location specified on the license, which shall be the organization's principal place of business. (3) An initial or renewed license issued under this section is valid for a period of one year. The attorney general shall prescribe by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code a staggered annual schedule of license application deadlines in order to facilitate the efficient processing of applications. (B) The application shall be accompanied by a license fee as follows: (1) If the charitable organization was not licensed to conduct bingo under this chapter before July 1, 2003, a fee established by the attorney general by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (2) If the charitable organization was licensed to conduct bingo under this chapter before July 1, 2003, the following applicable fee: (a) For a type I license for a charitable organization that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee of two hundred dollars; (b) For a type II or type III license for a charitable organization that previously has not been licensed under this chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and that wishes to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee of five hundred dollars; (c) For a type II or type III license for a charitable organization that previously has been licensed under this chapter to conduct instant bingo or electronic instant bingo and that desires to conduct bingo during twenty-six or more weeks in any calendar year, a license fee that is based upon the gross profits received by the charitable organization from the operation of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo during the one-year period ending on the thirty-first day of October of the year immediately preceding date that is two months before the year application deadline for which the license is sought renewal, and that is one of the following: (i) Five hundred dollars, if the total is fifty thousand dollars or less; (ii) One thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one-fourth per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than fifty thousand dollars but less than two hundred fifty thousand one dollars; (iii) Two thousand two hundred fifty dollars plus one-half per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars but less than five hundred thousand one dollars; (iv) Three thousand five hundred dollars plus one per cent of the gross profit, if the total is more than five hundred thousand dollars but less than one million one dollars; (v) Five thousand dollars plus one per cent of the gross profit, if the total is one million one dollars or more. (c)(d) For a type I, type II, or type III license for a charitable organization that desires to conduct bingo during fewer than twenty-six weeks in any calendar year, a reduced license fee established by the attorney general by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (C) The application shall be in the form prescribed by the attorney general, shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant, and shall contain all of the following: (1) The name and post-office address of the applicant; (2) A statement that the applicant is a charitable organization and that it has been in continuous existence as a charitable organization in this state for two years immediately preceding the making of the application; (3) The location at which the organization will conduct bingo, which location shall be within the county in which the principal place of business of the applicant is located, the days of the week and the times on each of those days when bingo will be conducted, whether the organization owns, leases, or subleases the premises, and a copy of the rental agreement if it leases or subleases the premises; (4) A statement of the applicant's previous history, record, and association that is sufficient to establish that the applicant is a charitable organization, and a copy of a determination letter that is issued by the Internal Revenue Service and states that the organization is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code; (5) A statement as to whether the applicant has ever had any previous application refused, whether it previously has had a license revoked or suspended, and the reason stated by the attorney general for the refusal, revocation, or suspension; (6) A statement of the charitable purposes for which the net profit derived from bingo described in division (O)(1) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code will be used, or a statement of how the net profit derived from instant bingo or electronic instant bingo will be distributed in accordance with section 2915.101 of the Revised Code, as applicable; (7) Other necessary and reasonable information that the attorney general may require by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code; (8) If the applicant is a charitable trust as defined in section 109.23 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has registered with the attorney general pursuant to section 109.26 of the Revised Code or filed annual reports pursuant to section 109.31 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do either, the exemption in section 109.26 or 109.31 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (9) If the applicant is a charitable organization as defined in section 1716.01 of the Revised Code, a statement as to whether it has filed with the attorney general a registration statement pursuant to section 1716.02 of the Revised Code and a financial report pursuant to section 1716.04 of the Revised Code, and, if it is not required to do both, the exemption in section 1716.03 of the Revised Code that applies to it; (10) In the case of an applicant seeking to qualify as a youth athletic park organization, a statement issued by a board or body vested with authority under Chapter 755. of the Revised Code for the supervision and maintenance of recreation facilities in the territory in which the organization is located, certifying that the playing fields owned by the organization were open for use to all residents of that territory, regardless of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, for athletic activities by youth athletic organizations that do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, or national origin, and that the fields were not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. That type of board or body is authorized to issue the statement upon request and shall issue the statement if it finds that the applicant's playing fields were so used. (D) The attorney general, within thirty days after receiving a timely filed application from a charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section that has not expired and has not been revoked or suspended, shall send a temporary permit to the applicant specifying the date on which the application was filed with the attorney general and stating that, pursuant to section 119.06 of the Revised Code, the applicant may continue to conduct bingo until a new license is granted or, if the application is rejected, until fifteen days after notice of the rejection is mailed to the applicant. The temporary permit does not affect the validity of the applicant's application and does not grant any rights to the applicant except those rights specifically granted in section 119.06 of the Revised Code. The issuance of a temporary permit by the attorney general pursuant to this division does not prohibit the attorney general from rejecting the applicant's application because of acts that the applicant committed, or actions that the applicant failed to take, before or after the issuance of the temporary permit. (E) Within thirty days after receiving an initial license application from a charitable organization to conduct bingo, the attorney general shall conduct a preliminary review of the application and notify the applicant regarding any deficiencies. Once an application is deemed complete, or beginning on the thirtieth day after the application is filed, if the attorney general failed to notify the applicant of any deficiencies, the attorney general shall have an additional sixty days to conduct an investigation and either grant, grant with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or deny the application based on findings established and communicated in accordance with divisions (F) and (I) of this section. As an option to granting, granting with limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions, or denying an initial license application, the attorney general may grant a temporary license and request additional time to conduct the investigation if the attorney general has cause to believe that additional time is necessary to complete the investigation and has notified the applicant in writing about the specific concerns raised during the investigation. (F)(1) The attorney general shall adopt rules to enforce sections 2915.01, 2915.02, and 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code to ensure that bingo is conducted in accordance with those sections and to maintain proper control over the conduct of bingo. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rules shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall license charitable organizations to conduct bingo in conformance with this chapter and with the licensing provisions of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (2) If any of the following applies to an organization, the attorney general may refuse to grant a license to the organization, may revoke or suspend the organization's license, or may place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the organization's license for a limited or indefinite period, as determined by the attorney general: (a) The organization fails or has failed at any time to meet any requirement of section 109.26, 109.31, or 1716.02, or sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code, or violates or has violated any provision of sections 2915.02 or 2915.07 to 2915.13 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (b) The organization makes or has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of the license in an application filed under this section. (c) The organization submits or has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to an application if the information is material to the granting of the license. (d) The organization maintains or has maintained any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be kept pursuant to section 2915.10 of the Revised Code, if applicable. (e) The attorney general has good cause to believe that the organization will not conduct bingo in accordance with sections 2915.07 to 2915.15 of the Revised Code or with any rule adopted by the attorney general pursuant to this chapter. (3) If the attorney general has good cause to believe that any director or officer of the organization has breached the director's or officer's fiduciary duty to, or committed theft or any other type of misconduct related to, the organization or any other charitable organization that has been issued a bingo license under this chapter, the attorney general may refuse to grant a license to the organization, may impose limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on the license, or may revoke or suspend the organization's license for a period not to exceed five years. (4) The attorney general may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing procedures allowing the attorney general to seek a summary suspension of an organization's license issued under this section, temporary license issued under this section, or temporary permit issued under this section if the attorney general has good cause to believe that the organization or any of the organization's employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or partners, has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (5) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on an organization licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (5) (6) For the purposes of division (F) of this section, any action of an officer, trustee, agent, representative, or bingo game operator of an organization is an action of the organization. (G) The attorney general may grant licenses to charitable organizations that are branches, lodges, or chapters of national charitable organizations. (H) The attorney general shall send notice of any of the following actions in writing to the prosecuting attorney and sheriff of the county in which the charitable organization is located and to any other law enforcement agency in that county that so requests, of all of the following: (1) The issuance of a license under this section; (2) The issuance of an amended license under this section; (3) The rejection of an application for and refusal to grant a license under this section; (4) The revocation of any license previously issued under this section; (5) The suspension of any license previously issued under this section; (6) The placing of any limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions placed on a license issued under this section. (I) A license issued by the attorney general under this section shall set forth the information contained on the application of the charitable organization that the attorney general determines is relevant, including, but not limited to, the location at which the organization will conduct bingo, whether the license is a type I, type II, or type III license, and the days of the week and the times on each of those days when bingo will be conducted. If the attorney general refuses to grant, places limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revokes or suspends a license, the attorney general shall notify the applicant in writing and specifically identify the reason for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension in narrative form and, if applicable, by identifying the section of the Revised Code violated. The failure of the attorney general to give the written notice of the reasons for the refusal, revocation, limit, restriction, probationary condition, or suspension or a mistake in the written notice does not affect the validity of the attorney general's refusal to grant, or the revocation or suspension of, or limit, restriction, probationary condition on, a license. If the attorney general fails to give the written notice or if there is a mistake in the written notice, the applicant may bring an action to compel the attorney general to comply with this division or to correct the mistake, but the attorney general's order refusing to grant, or placing a limit, restriction, or probationary condition on, or revoking or suspending, a license shall not be enjoined during the pendency of the action. (J)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(2) of this section, a charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section but that cannot conduct bingo at the location, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on the license due to circumstances that make it impractical to do so, or that desires to conduct instant bingo other than at a bingo session at additional locations not identified on the license, may apply in writing, together with an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney general, at least thirty days prior to a change in or addition of a location, day of the week, or time, and request an amended license. (b) As applicable, the application shall describe the causes making it impractical for the organization to conduct bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when it desires to conduct bingo and, as applicable, shall indicate the additional locations at which it desires to conduct instant bingo other than at a bingo session. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of this section, the attorney general shall issue the amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, and the organization shall surrender its original license to the attorney general. (2)(a) A charitable organization that has been issued a license under this section to conduct electronic instant bingo but that cannot conduct electronic instant bingo at the location, or on the day of the week or at the time, specified on the license due to circumstances that make it impractical to do so, may apply in writing, together with an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, to the attorney general, at least thirty days prior to a change in a location, day of the week, or time, and request an amended license. A charitable organization may not apply for an amended license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any additional location. (b) The application shall describe the causes making it impractical for the organization to conduct electronic instant bingo in conformity with its license and shall indicate the location, days of the week, and times on each of those days when it desires to conduct electronic instant bingo. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(3) of this section, the attorney general shall issue the amended license in accordance with division (I) of this section, and the organization shall surrender its original license to the attorney general. (3) The attorney general may refuse to grant an amended license under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section according to the terms of division (F) of this section. (K) The attorney general may enter into a written contract with any other state agency to delegate to that state agency the powers prescribed to the attorney general under Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code. (L) The attorney general, by rule adopted pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code, may adopt rules to determine the requirements for a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to be in good standing in the state. Sec. 2915.081. (A) No distributor shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to another person, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, for use in this state without having obtained a license from the attorney general under this section. (B)(1) The attorney general may issue a distributor license to any person that meets the requirements of this section. The application for the license shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general and be accompanied by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The license is valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee for the license is five thousand dollars. (2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the attorney general a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the state and to any person who may have a cause of action against the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. (C)(1) The attorney general may refuse to issue a distributor license to any person applicant to which any of the following applies, or to any person that has an officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest any owner of ten per cent or more of the applicant and to whom any of the following applies: (1) (a) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (2) (b) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of a license in an application submitted to the attorney general under this section or in a similar application submitted to a gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the statement resulted in license revocation through administrative action in the other jurisdiction. (3) (c) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to the application to the attorney general under this section, if the information is material to the granting of the license. (4) (d) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has failed to correct any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be maintained under division (F) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code. (5) (e) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has had a license related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States. (6) (f) The attorney general has good cause to believe that a person the applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has committed a breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct related to a charitable organization that has obtained a bingo license issued under this chapter. (g) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner has filed, or had filed against it, a proceeding for bankruptcy, or has been involved in a formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or otherwise work out the payment of any debt. (h) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner has been served with a complaint or other notice filed with any public body regarding a payment of any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has been delinquent for one or more years. (i) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner is or has been a defendant in litigation involving its business practices. (j) The reputation, experience, and financial integrity of the applicant and any officer or partner or any owner of ten per cent or more of the applicant is of a nature or quality such that the issuance of a license is, in the attorney general's opinion, against the public interest. (k) The financial ability of the applicant is insufficient to purchase and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to provide an adequate surety bond. (l) Awarding a license would undermine the public's confidence in charitable gaming in this state. (2) The attorney general may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying additional reasons for which the attorney general may refuse to issue a distributor license under this section. (D) The attorney general shall not issue a distributor license to any person that is involved in the conduct of bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or that is a lessor of premises used for the conduct of bingo. This division does not prohibit a distributor from advising charitable organizations on the use and benefit of specific bingo supplies or prohibit a distributor from advising a customer on operational methods to improve bingo profitability. (E)(1) No distributor shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any person, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, for use in this state except to or for the use of a charitable organization that has been issued a license under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or to another distributor that has been issued a license under this section. No distributor shall accept payment for the sale or other provision of bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (2) No distributor may donate, give, loan, lease, or otherwise provide any bingo supplies or equipment, or modify, convert, add to, or remove parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale, to or for the use of a charitable organization for use in a bingo session conditioned on or in consideration for an exclusive right to provide bingo supplies to the charitable organization. A distributor may provide a licensed charitable organization with free samples of the distributor's products to be used as prizes or to be used for the purpose of sampling. (3) No distributor shall purchase bingo supplies for use in this state from any person except from a manufacturer issued a license under section 2915.082 of the Revised Code or from another distributor issued a license under this section. Subject to division (D) of section 2915.082 of the Revised Code, no distributor shall pay for purchased bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (4) No distributor shall participate in the conduct of bingo on behalf of a charitable organization or have any direct or indirect ownership interest in a premises used for the conduct of bingo. (5) No distributor shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, or receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. (F)(1) No distributor shall knowingly sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state, or install, maintain, update, or repair an electronic instant bingo system, without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to the person's distributor license issued under this section. An applicant for a distributor license under this section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to that license. (2) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement shall submit the application on a form prescribed by the attorney general and shall submit one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement, the attorney general shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division (A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee required under division (C)(3) of that section. (3) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant unless the attorney general has received the results of the criminal records check described in division (F)(2) of this section. The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement to an applicant if the applicant, any officer or partner of the applicant, or any person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the applicant has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter or has violated any existing or former law or rule of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter. (4) An electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement issued under this section shall be valid for the period of the underlying distributor license. (G) The attorney general may suspend, place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a distributor license or an electronic instant bingo distributor endorsement, for a limited or indefinite period of time at the attorney general's discretion, for any of the following reasons: (1) Any reason for which the attorney general may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; (2) The distributor holding the license or endorsement violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter; (3) The distributor or any officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the distributor is convicted of either of the following: (a) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States; (b) Any gambling offense. (H) The attorney general may adopt rules for the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, limitation, restriction, or condition of a distributor license or endorsement, and to enforce any other provisions of this section, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall adopt rules in accordance with that chapter prescribing procedures allowing the attorney general to seek a summary suspension of a person's license or endorsement issued under this section if the attorney general has good cause to believe that the person or any of the person's employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or partners has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (I) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on a distributor licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, or for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (J) Whoever violates division (A), (E), or (F) of this section is guilty of illegally operating as a distributor. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally operating as a distributor is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A), (E), or (F) of this section, illegally operating as a distributor is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2915.082. (A) No manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies for use in this state without having obtained a license from the attorney general under this section. (B)(1) The attorney general may issue a manufacturer license to any person that meets the requirements of this section. The application for the license shall be on a form prescribed by the attorney general and be accompanied by the annual fee prescribed by this section. The license is valid for a period of one year, and the annual fee for the license is five thousand dollars. (2) Upon applying for or renewing a license under this section, an applicant shall file with and have approved by the attorney general a bond in which the applicant shall be the principal obligor, in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, with one or more sureties authorized to do business in this state. The applicant shall maintain the bond in effect as long as the license is valid; however, the liability of the surety under the bond shall not exceed an all-time aggregate liability of fifty thousand dollars. The bond, which may be in the form of a rider to a larger blanket liability bond, shall run to the state and to any person who may have a cause of action against the principal obligor of the bond for any liability arising out of a violation by the obligor of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter. (C) The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying the suitability factors for issuing manufacturer licenses to applicants under this section and the reasons for which the attorney general may refuse to issue a manufacturer license to any person to which any of the following applies, or to including all of the following: (1) Whether any of the following apply to the applicant or to any person that has an officer, or partner, or other person who has an ownership interest any owner of ten per cent or more and to whom any of the following applies of the applicant: (1) (a) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (2) (b) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has made an incorrect or false statement that is material to the granting of a license in an application submitted to the attorney general under this section or in a similar application submitted to a gambling licensing authority in another jurisdiction if the statement resulted in license revocation through administrative action in the other jurisdiction. (3) (c) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has submitted any incorrect or false information relating to the application to the attorney general under this section, if the information is material to the granting of the license. (4) (d) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has failed to correct any incorrect or false information that is material to the granting of the license in the records required to be maintained under division (G) of section 2915.10 of the Revised Code. (5) (e) The person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has had a license related to gambling revoked or suspended under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States. (6) (f) The attorney general has good cause to believe that the person applicant, officer, or partner, or owner has committed a breach of fiduciary duty, theft, or other type of misconduct, related to a charitable organization that has obtained a bingo license under this chapter. (g) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner has filed, or had filed against it, a proceeding for bankruptcy, or has been involved in a formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or otherwise work out the payment of any debt. (h) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner has been served with a complaint or other notice filed with any public body regarding a payment of any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has been delinquent for one or more years. (i) The applicant, officer, partner, or owner is or has been a defendant in litigation involving its business practices. (2) The reputation, experience, and financial integrity of the applicant and any officer or partner or any owner of ten per cent or more of the applicant; (3) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to provide an adequate surety bond; (4) Whether awarding a license would undermine the public's confidence in charitable gaming in this state. (D)(1) No manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies to any person for use in this state except to a distributor that has been issued a license under section 2915.081 of the Revised Code. No manufacturer shall accept payment for the sale of bingo supplies other than by check or electronic fund transfer. (2) No manufacturer shall knowingly solicit, offer, pay, or receive any kickback, bribe, or undocumented rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind, in return for providing bingo supplies to any person in this state. (E)(1) No manufacturer shall knowingly sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state, or submit an electronic instant bingo system for testing and approval under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code, without first obtaining an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to the person's manufacturer license issued under this section. An applicant for a manufacturer license under this section may apply simultaneously for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to that license. (2) A manufacturer licensed under this section may only sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide electronic instant bingo systems that contain proprietary software owned by or licensed to the manufacturer. If the proprietary software is licensed to the manufacturer, the manufacturer shall provide a copy of the license along with the application for an endorsement under this section. (3) An applicant for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement shall submit the application on a form prescribed by the attorney general and shall submit one complete set of fingerprints directly to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check. The applicant shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and shall fill out the form the superintendent prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of that section. Upon receiving an application for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement, the attorney general shall request the superintendent, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the applicant's fingerprint impressions in accordance with division (A)(18) of that section. The applicant shall pay any fee required under division (C)(3) of that section. (4) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to an applicant unless the attorney general has received the results of the criminal records check described in division (E)(3) of this section. The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement to an applicant if the applicant, any officer or partner of the applicant, or any person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the applicant has violated any existing or former law or rule of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter. (F)(1) The attorney general may suspend, place limits, restrictions, or probationary conditions on, or revoke a manufacturer license or an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement for a limited or indefinite period of time for any of the following reasons: (a) Any reason for which the attorney general may refuse to issue the license or endorsement; (b) The manufacturer holding the license or endorsement violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the attorney general under this chapter; (c) The manufacturer or any officer, partner, or other person who has an ownership interest of ten per cent or more in the manufacturer is convicted of either of the following: (i) A felony under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States; (ii) Any gambling offense. (2) The attorney general may perform an onsite inspection of a manufacturer of bingo supplies that is selling, offering to sell, or otherwise providing or offering to provide bingo supplies or that is applying for a license to sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide bingo supplies in this state. (3)(a) The attorney general shall establish by rule an application and renewal fee for an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement in an amount sufficient to cover the costs the attorney general incurs in processing applications for electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsements and investigating an applicant's suitability. (b) If the cost of processing a particular application and investigating the applicant's suitability exceeds the amount of the application and renewal fee, the attorney general may charge the applicant an additional fee as necessary to cover that cost. (c) The attorney general shall not issue an electronic instant bingo manufacturer endorsement unless the attorney general has received payment in full from the applicant for all fees to be charged under this section. (G) The attorney general may adopt rules for the application, acceptance, denial, suspension, revocation, limitation, restriction, or condition of a manufacturer license or endorsement described in this section, and to enforce any other provisions of this section, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall adopt rules in accordance with that chapter prescribing procedures allowing the attorney general to seek a summary suspension of a person's license or endorsement issued under this section if the attorney general has good cause to believe that the person or any of the person's employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or partners, has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (H) The attorney general may impose a civil fine on a manufacturer licensed or permitted under this chapter for failure to comply with any restrictions, limits, or probationary conditions on its license, and for failure to comply with this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, according to a schedule of fines that the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I) Whoever violates division (A), (D), or (E) of this section is guilty of illegally operating as a manufacturer. Except as otherwise provided in this division, illegally operating as a manufacturer is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A), (D), or (E) of this section, illegally operating as a manufacturer is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2915.083. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall not disclose to the public any of the following information or documents concerning a person who has applied for or been issued a license under this chapter or the person's spouse, dependent, or employee, unless the person authorizes the attorney general to disclose the information: (1) A social security number, passport number, or federal tax identification number; (2) A home address, telephone number, or electronic mail address; (3) A birth certificate; (4) A driver's license or state identification card number; (5) The name or address of a previous spouse; (6) A date or place of birth; (7) Any personal financial information or records, including personal tax returns and information and records of criminal proceedings; (8) Any information concerning a minor child; (9) Any information concerning a person the attorney general has reason to know is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; (10) Any trade secret, medical records, or patents or exclusive licenses; (11) Security information, including risk prevention plans, detection and countermeasures, location of count rooms or other money storage areas, emergency management plans, security and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols, and theft and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures; (12) Any other information the attorney general receives from another jurisdiction relating to a person who holds, held, or has applied for a license under this chapter. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of this section, both of the following are subject to disclosure as a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code: (1) The information a licensee under this chapter or an applicant for a license under this chapter has submitted to the attorney general as part of applying for or renewing the license; (2) The attorney general's reasons for denying or revoking a license under this chapter or for taking other disciplinary action under this chapter. (C) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit the attorney general from disclosing information and documents described in that division to the Ohio casino control commission, the state lottery commission, the inspector general, a prosecuting authority, a law enforcement agency, or any other appropriate governmental entity or licensing agency, provided that the recipient shall not disclose the information and documents to the public. Sec. 2915.10. (A) No charitable organization that conducts bingo or a game of chance pursuant to division (D) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code shall fail to maintain the following records for at least three years from the date on which the bingo or game of chance is conducted: (1) An itemized list of the gross receipts of each bingo session, each game of instant bingo by serial number, each electronic instant bingo game by serial number, each raffle, each punch board game, and each game of chance, and an itemized list of the gross profits of each game of instant bingo by serial number and each electronic instant bingo game by serial number; (2) An itemized list of all expenses, other than prizes, that are incurred in conducting bingo, the name of each person to whom the expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the expenses; (3) A list of all prizes awarded during each bingo session, each raffle, each punch board game, and each game of chance conducted by the charitable organization, the total prizes awarded from each game of instant bingo by serial number and each electronic instant bingo game by serial number, and the name, address, and social security number of all persons who are winners of prizes of six hundred dollars or more in value; (4) An itemized list of the recipients of the net profit of the bingo or game of chance, including the name and address of each recipient to whom the money is distributed, and if the organization uses the net profit of bingo, or the money or assets received from a game of chance, for any charitable or other purpose set forth in division (V) of section 2915.01, division (D) of section 2915.02, or section 2915.101 of the Revised Code, a list of each purpose and an itemized list of each expenditure for each purpose; (5) The number of persons who participate in any bingo session or game of chance that is conducted by the charitable organization; (6) A list of receipts from the sale of food and beverages by the charitable organization or one of its auxiliary units or societies, if the receipts were excluded from gross receipts under division (T) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code; (7) An itemized list of all expenses incurred at each bingo session, each raffle, each punch board game, or each game of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo conducted by the charitable organization in the sale of food and beverages by the charitable organization or by an auxiliary unit or society of the charitable organization, the name of each person to whom the expenses are paid, and a receipt for all of the expenses. (B) A charitable organization shall keep the records that it is required to maintain pursuant to division (A) of this section at its principal place of business in this state or at its headquarters in this state and shall notify the attorney general of the location at which those records are kept. (C) The gross profit from each bingo session or game described in division (O)(1) or (2) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into a checking account devoted exclusively to the bingo session or game. Payments for allowable expenses incurred in conducting the bingo session or game and payments to recipients of some or all of the net profit of the bingo session or game shall be made only by checks or electronic fund transfers drawn on the bingo session or game account. (D) Each charitable organization shall conduct and record an inventory of all of its bingo supplies as of the first day of November of each year. (E) The attorney general may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish standards of accounting, record keeping, and reporting to ensure that gross receipts from bingo or games of chance are properly accounted for. (F) A distributor shall maintain, for a period of three years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of each instance of its selling or otherwise providing to another person bingo supplies for use in this state. The record shall include all of the following for each instance: (1) The name of the manufacturer from which the distributor purchased the bingo supplies and the date of the purchase; (2) The name and address of the charitable organization or other distributor to which the bingo supplies were sold or otherwise provided; (3) A description that clearly identifies the bingo supplies; (4) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals sold or otherwise provided to each charitable organization. (G) A manufacturer shall maintain, for a period of three years after the date of its sale or other provision, a record of each instance of its selling or otherwise providing bingo supplies for use in this state. The record shall include all of the following for each instance: (1) The name and address of the distributor to whom the bingo supplies were sold or otherwise provided; (2) A description that clearly identifies the bingo supplies, including serial numbers; (3) Invoices that include the nonrepeating serial numbers of all paper bingo cards and sheets and all instant bingo deals sold or otherwise provided to each distributor. (H) The attorney general or any law enforcement agency may do all of the following: (1) Investigate any charitable organization, distributor, or manufacturer or any officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer; (2) Examine the accounts and records of the charitable organization, distributor, or manufacturer or of any officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer; (3) Conduct inspections, audits, and observations of bingo or games of chance; (4) Conduct inspections of the premises where bingo or games of chance are conducted or where bingo supplies are manufactured or distributed; (5) Take any other necessary and reasonable action to determine if a violation of any provision of this chapter has occurred and to determine whether section 2915.11 of the Revised Code has been complied with. If any law enforcement agency has reasonable grounds to believe that a charitable organization, distributor, or manufacturer or an officer, agent, trustee, member, or employee of the organization, distributor, or manufacturer has violated any provision of this chapter, the law enforcement agency may proceed by action in the proper court to enforce this chapter, provided that the law enforcement agency shall give written notice to the attorney general when commencing an action as described in this division. (I) No person shall destroy, alter, conceal, withhold, or deny access to any accounts or records of a charitable organization, distributor, or manufacturer that have been requested for examination, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any inspection, audit, or observation of bingo or a game of chance, of premises where bingo or a game of chance is conducted, or of premises where bingo supplies are manufactured or distributed, or refuse to comply with any reasonable request of, or obstruct, impede, or interfere with any other reasonable action undertaken by, the attorney general or a law enforcement agency pursuant to division (H) of this section. (J) Whoever violates division (A) or (I) of this section is guilty of failure to maintain charitable gaming records, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 2915.14. (A) No charitable organization shall conduct electronic instant bingo unless all of the following are true: (1) The organization is a veteran's organization described in division (J) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, or is a fraternal organization described in division (L) of section 2915.01 of the Revised Code, and the organization qualified as a veteran's organization or fraternal organization, as applicable, on or before June 30, 2021. (2) The organization is a veteran's organization described in subsection 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or is, and has received from the internal revenue service a determination letter that is currently in effect stating that the organization is, exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a), and is described in subsection 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. (3) The organization has not conducted a raffle in violation of division (B) of section 2915.092 of the Revised Code using an electronic raffle machine, as described in Ohio Veterans and Fraternal Charitable Coalition v. DeWine, Case No. 13-CV-13610 (C.P. Franklin Co. February 23, 2018), at any time on or after January 1, 2022. (B) No charitable organization that conducts electronic instant bingo shall do any of the following: (1) Possess an electronic instant bingo system that was not obtained in accordance with this chapter or with any rule adopted under this chapter; (2) Conduct electronic instant bingo on any day, at any time, or on any premises not specified on the organization's type II or type III license issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code; (3) Hold more than one valid license to conduct electronic instant bingo at any one time; (4) Conduct electronic instant bingo on more than one premises or on any premises other than the charitable organization's principal place of business; (5) Operate more than ten electronic bingo systems at the premises on which the charitable organization conducts electronic instant bingo under its license; (6) Fail to display both of the following conspicuously at the premises on which the charitable organization conducts electronic instant bingo: (a) The charitable organization's bingo license; (b) The serial number of each deal of electronic instant bingo tickets being sold. (7) Permit any person the charitable organization knows, or should have known, to be under eighteen years of age to play electronic instant bingo; (8) Sell or provide to any person an electronic instant bingo ticket for a price different from the price displayed on the game flare for that deal, except that the charitable organization may give a participant who wins an electronic instant bingo game an electronic instant bingo ticket as a prize in place of a cash prize; (9) Fail, once an electronic instant bingo deal is begun, to continue to sell tickets in that deal until all prizes have been awarded; (10) Permit any person whom the organization knows, or should have known, has been convicted of a felony or gambling offense in any jurisdiction to be a bingo game operator in the conduct of electronic instant bingo; (11) Permit a bingo game operator to play electronic instant bingo; (12)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(12)(b) of this section, pay compensation to a bingo game operator for conducting electronic instant bingo. (b) Division (B)(12)(a) of this section does not prohibit an employee of a veteran's organization or fraternal organization from redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets or vouchers for the organization's members or invited guests, so long as no portion of the employee's compensation is paid from any bingo receipts. (13) Pay consulting fees to any person in relation to electronic instant bingo. (C) No person shall sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide or offer to provide an electronic instant bingo system to any person for use in this state unless the electronic instant bingo system has been approved under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code. (D) The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to ensure the integrity of electronic instant bingo, including, but not limited to, rules governing all of the following: (1) The requirements to receive a license or endorsement to conduct electronic instant bingo; (2) The location and number of electronic instant bingo systems in use, which shall not exceed ten at the single licensed location per organization; (3) The times when electronic instant bingo may be offered; (4) Signage requirements in facilities where electronic instant bingo is offered; (5) Electronic instant bingo device and system specifications, including reveal features and game themes; (6) Procedures and standards for the review, approval, inspection, and monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems, as described in section 2915.15 of the Revised Code; (7) Procedures and standards for the review and approval of any changes to technology, systems, or games licensed or permitted under this chapter; (8) The fees to be charged under section 2915.15 of the Revised Code for review, approval, inspection, and monitoring of electronic instant bingo systems; (9) Procedures allowing the attorney general to seek a summary suspension of a license to conduct electronic instant bingo or a license to manufacture or distribute electronic instant bingo systems if the attorney general has good cause to believe that the person or organization licensed to conduct electronic instant bingo, or the person or organization licensed to manufacture or distribute electronic instant bingo systems, or any of the organization's employees, officers, directors, agents, representatives, or partners, has violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter. (E) Whoever knowingly violates division (A), (B), or (C) of this section or a rule adopted under division (D) of this section is guilty of illegal electronic instant bingo conduct. Illegal electronic instant bingo conduct is a misdemeanor of the first degree, except that if the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section or of a rule adopted under division (D) of this section, illegal instant bingo conduct is a felony of the fifth degree. Section 2. That existing sections 109.32, 2915.02, 2915.08, 2915.081, 2915.082, 2915.10, and 2915.14 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. Except as otherwise provided in division (F) of section 2915.08 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, a bingo license issued under that section that is valid on the effective date of this section remains valid until the next date by which the licensee must apply to renew the license under the rules of the Attorney General, as described in division (A)(3) of that section.